Utah statutes.
39-6-54.   Convening authority refers record to SJA -- Opinion.

The convening authority shall refer the record of each military court to the SJA, who shall submit a written opinion to the convening authority.  If the final action of the court is an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion is limited to questions of jurisdiction.



Amended by Chapter 287, 2008 General Session

